Washington statutes.
RCW 19.31.180

Posting of fee limitation and remedy provisions.

Each licensee shall post the following in a conspicuous place in each office in which it conducts business: (1) The substance of RCW 19.31.150 through 19.31.170; and (2) a name and address provided by the director, in a form prescribed by him or her, of a person to whom complaints concerning possible violation of this chapter may be made. All words required to be posted pursuant to this section shall be printed in ten point boldface type.

[ 2011 c 336 s 535; 1969 ex.s. c 228 s 18.]